Wisconsin, session 2025, AB305.
do enact as follows:AB305,13Section 1. 1.10 (3) (w) of the statutes is created to read:AB305,1,541.10 (3) (w) The rusty patched bumble bee (Bombus affinis) is the state native 5insect.AB305,26Section 2. 1.10 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB305,2,371.10 (4) The Wisconsin Blue Book shall include the information contained in 1this section concerning the state song, ballad, waltz, dance, beverage, tree, grain, 2flower, bird, fish, animal, domestic animal, wildlife animal, dog, insect, native 3insect, fossil, mineral, rock, soil, fruit, tartan, pastry, dairy product, and herb.AB305,2,44